Connecticut, session 2026, SB00398.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 54-124a of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
3 2026):
4 (c) Ten of the members of the board shall devote full time to the
5 performance of their duties under this section and shall be compensated
6 therefor in such amount as the Commissioner of Administrative
7 Services determines, subject to the provisions of section 4-40. The other
8 members of the board shall receive, [one hundred ten dollars for each
9 day spent in] within available appropriations, a per diem payment in
10 such amount as the Commissioner of Administrative Services
11 determines, subject to the provisions of section 4-40, for the performance
12 of their duties and additionally shall be reimbursed for necessary
13 expenses incurred in the performance of such duties. The chairperson
14 or, in the chairperson's absence or inability to act, a member designated
15 by the chairperson to serve temporarily as chairperson, shall be present
SB398 / File No. 498 1

SB398 File No. 498
16 at all meetings of the board and participate in all decisions.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 54-124a(c)
JUD Joint Favorable
SB398 / File No. 498 2

SB398 File No. 498
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Department of Correction (Board GF - Cost Up to Up to
of Pardons and Parole) 192,000 192,000
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which replaces the current $110 per diem payment for the
part-time members of the Board of Pardons and Paroles with an amount
determined by the Department of Administrative Services (DAS),
results in a cost to the Department of Correction of up to $192,000 in FY
27 and FY 28, to the extent that these payments are required.
The new per diem rate is estimated to be about $430 and each of the
five part-time board members are anticipated to work up to 120 days
per year. However, these positions are currently vacant. Each position
that is filled is estimated to incur an additional cost of up to $38,400
annually.1
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the per diem rate set by DAS.
1 Under current law, each of the part-time positions would cost up to $13,200 annually
if filled.
SB398 / File No. 498 3

SB398 File No. 498
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 398
AN ACT CONCERNING THE BOARD OF PARDONS AND PAROLES.